Maine, session 132, LD1180.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9420, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 226, §1, is amended to
read:
1. Prohibition of certain fees. Except as authorized by federal law and regulation, a
customer of a person may not be penalized by that person or be required to pay a fee for
opting out of receiving from the person a billing statement by electronic record rather than
in paper form. A person may offer an incentive to a customer to accept a billing statement
from the person by electronic record rather than in paper form.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §705, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Rules. The Attorney General shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.